Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. General Provisions

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act and Close Corporation Supplement,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1990).

§ 17-18-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Management Stability Act”.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

§ 17-18-102.
Definitions.

The definitions used in the Wyoming Business Corporations Act (W.S.

17-16-101

through

17-16-1810

) shall apply to this act unless inconsistent with the definitions in this section.

As used in this act:

“Affiliate” means a person that directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, another person;

“Associate,” when used to indicate a relationship with any person, means:

Any entity of which the person is a director, officer or partner or is, directly or indirectly, the owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of voting stock or similar securities of the entity;

Any trust or other estate in which the person has at least a ten percent (10%) beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; or

Any relative or spouse of the person, or any relative of the spouse, who has the same residence as the person or who is a director or officer of the person or any of its affiliates.

“Beneficial owner of a security” means any person who, directly or indirectly, has the power to vote or direct the voting of all or part of the voting rights of the security, or has the power to dispose of or direct the disposition of the security;

“Business combination,” when used in reference to any corporation and any interested stockholder of that corporation, means:

Any merger, consolidation or share exchange of the corporation or any subsidiary with:

The interested stockholder;

A foreign or domestic corporation that is, or after the merger, consolidation or share exchange would be, an affiliate or associate of the interested stockholder; or

Another corporation, if the merger, consolidation or share exchange is caused by an interested stockholder, and as a result of the merger, consolidation or share exchange any section of this act does not apply to the surviving corporation.

Any sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, transfer or other disposition, in one (1) transaction or a series of transactions, except proportionately as a stockholder of the corporation, to or with the interested stockholder or any affiliate or associate of the interested stockholder, whether as part of a dissolution or otherwise, of assets of the corporation or of any subsidiary which assets:

Have an aggregate market value equal to ten percent (10%) or more of either the aggregate market value of all the assets of the corporation determined on a consolidated basis or the aggregate market value of all the outstanding stock of the corporation;

Have an aggregate book value equal to ten percent (10%) or more of either the aggregate book value of all the assets of the corporation determined on a consolidated basis or of the aggregate stockholders equity of the corporation; or

Represent ten percent (10%) or more of the earning power or net income, determined on a consolidated basis, of the corporation.

Any transaction or series of transactions which results in the issuance or transfer by the corporation, or by any subsidiary, of any stock of the corporation or of the subsidiary to the interested stockholder except:

Any transaction pursuant to the exercise, exchange or conversion of securities into stock of the corporation or any subsidiary, which securities before the stockholder became an interested stockholder were outstanding and exercisable for or convertible into the stock; or

Any of the following transactions provided there is no increase in the interested stockholder’s proportionate share of the corporation’s stock of any class or series or of the corporation’s voting stock:

Pursuant to a distribution made, or the exercise, exchange or conversion of securities into stock of the corporation or any subsidiary of securities distributed, pro rata to all holders of a class or series of stock of the corporation, after the stockholder became an interested stockholder;

Pursuant to an exchange offer by the corporation to purchase stock made on the same terms to all holders of the stock; or

Any issuance or transfer of stock by the corporation.

Any transaction involving the corporation or any subsidiary which has the effect, directly or indirectly, of increasing the proportionate share of the corporation’s or a subsidiary’s stock of any class or series, or securities convertible into the stock of any class or series, owned by the interested stockholder, except as a result of immaterial changes due to fractional share adjustments or as a result of any purchase or redemption of any shares of stock not caused, directly or indirectly, by the interested stockholder;

Any receipt by the interested stockholder of the benefit, directly or indirectly, except proportionately as a stockholder of the corporation, of any loans, advances, guarantees, pledges or other financial assistance, or a tax credit or other tax advantage, other than those expressly permitted in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph, provided by or through the corporation or any subsidiary; or

The adoption of a plan or a proposal for the liquidation and dissolution of the corporation proposed by, or pursuant to an agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whether or not in writing, with an interested stockholder or an affiliate or associate of the interested stockholder.

“Control,” including the term “controlling,” “controlled by” and “under common control with,” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting stock, by contract or otherwise. A person who is the owner of ten percent (10%) or more of an entity’s outstanding voting stock or similar interests shall be presumed to have control of the entity, in the absence of proof by a preponderance of the evidence to the contrary. A presumption of control shall not apply where the person holds voting stock or similar interests, in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this act, as an agent, bank, broker, nominee, custodian or trustee for one (1) or more owners who do not individually or as a group have control of the other person;

“Equity security” means:

Any share or similar security carrying, at the time of the takeover offer, the right to vote on any matter by virtue of the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or governing instrument of the target company or the right to vote for directors or persons performing substantially similar functions by operation of law;

Any security convertible into a security described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or any warrant or right to purchase that security; or

Any other security which, for the protection of investors, is an equity security pursuant to regulation of the secretary of state.

“Interested stockholder”:

Means any person and the affiliates and associates of the person, other than the corporation and any subsidiary, that:

Is the owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the outstanding voting stock of the corporation; or

Is an affiliate or associate of the corporation and was the owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of the outstanding voting stock of the corporation at any time within the three (3) year period immediately before it is to be determined whether the person is an interested stockholder.

But does not mean:

Any person who:

(1)

Owned shares in excess of the fifteen percent (15%) limitation as of January 1, 1990, acquired shares pursuant to a tender offer commenced prior to January 1, 1989, or owned shares pursuant to an exchange offer announced prior to January 1, 1989 and commenced within ninety (90) days; and

(2)

Continued to own shares in excess of the fifteen percent (15%) limitation or would have but for action by the corporation.

Any person who acquired the shares from a person described in subdivision (B)(I) of this paragraph by gift, inheritance or in a transaction in which no consideration was exchanged; or

Any person whose ownership of shares in excess of the fifteen percent (15%) limitation is the result of action taken solely by the corporation provided that the person shall be an interested stockholder if, after the corporate action, he acquires additional voting stock of the corporation, except as a result of further corporate action not caused, directly or indirectly, by that person.

“Large publicly traded corporation” means a corporation which had assets at the end of its most recent fiscal year of at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) according to generally accepted accounting principles and which:

Has a class of voting stock listed on a national securities exchange;

Has a class of voting stock authorized for quotation on an inter dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association; or

Has a class of voting stock held of record by more than one thousand (1,000) stockholders.

“Offeree” means a record or beneficial owner of equity securities of the class which an offeror acquires or offers to acquire in connection with a takeover offer;

“Offeror” means a person who makes or in any way participates in making a takeover offer. The term includes all affiliates of that person and all persons who act jointly or in concert with that person for the purpose of acquiring, holding or disposing of, or exercising any voting rights attached to, the equity securities of a target company. It also includes the target company with respect to acquisitions of its own equity securities and with respect to periods of time when it is controlled by or under common control with the offeror. It does not include a financial institution or broker-dealer loaning funds or extending credit to any offeror in the ordinary course of its business, or any accountant, attorney, financial institution, broker-dealer, newspaper or magazine of general circulation, consultant, or other person furnishing information, services, or advice to or performing ministerial or administrative duties for an offeror and not otherwise participating in the takeover offer;

“Owner” including the terms “own” and “owned” when used with respect to any stock means a person that individually or with or through any of its affiliates or associates:

Beneficially owns the stock, directly or indirectly;

Has the right to acquire the stock, whether the right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time, pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding, or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, warrants or options, or otherwise. A person shall not be deemed the owner of stock tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by that person or any of that person’s affiliates or associates until the tendered stock is accepted for purchase or exchange;

Has the right to vote the stock pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding. A person shall not be deemed the owner of any stock because of the person’s right to vote the stock if the agreement, arrangement or understanding to vote the stock arises solely from a revocable proxy or consent given in response to a proxy or consent solicitation made to ten (10) or more persons; or

Has any agreement, arrangement or understanding for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting, except voting pursuant to a revocable proxy or consent as described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, or disposing of that stock with any other person that beneficially owns, or whose affiliates or associates beneficially own, directly or indirectly, that stock.

“Qualified corporation” means any large publicly traded corporation, incorporated in Wyoming, and which has substantial business operations within Wyoming;

“Stockholder” means “shareholder” as defined by W.S. 17-16-140(a)(xxxix);

“Subsidiary” means a corporation or other person of which a majority of the outstanding voting stock or similar securities are owned, directly or indirectly, by the corporation;

“Substantial business operations within the state of Wyoming” means:

At least ten percent (10%) of the corporation’s full-time permanent employees are employed within the state;

At least one hundred (100) full-time permanent employees are employed within the state;

At least ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) in fair market value of the corporation’s assets are deposited within Wyoming financial institutions;

The principal operating headquarters and the primary offices of the chief executive officer are within Wyoming; or

The corporation has a combination of assets deposited within Wyoming financial institutions, assets assessed for ad valorem taxation within Wyoming, and assets within Wyoming not subject to ad valorem taxation which are sufficient to cause the corporation to pay the tax required by W.S. 17-16-1630(a). The payment of the tax required by W.S. 17-16-1630(a) shall be deemed conclusive evidence of substantial business operations within Wyoming.

“Substantially equivalent terms” means terms under which the fair market value of the consideration offered any offeree of a class of equity securities of the target company, determined on a per share or a per unit basis, are equal to the highest consideration offered in connection with a takeover offer to any other offeree of that class, determined on a per share or per unit basis;

“Takeover offer” means an offer to acquire or an acquisition of any equity security of a target company pursuant to a tender offer or request or invitation for tenders, if, after the acquisition, the offeror is or will be directly or indirectly a record or beneficial owner of more than ten percent (10%) of any class of the outstanding equity securities of the target company;

“Target company” means a qualified corporation other than:

A financial institution subject to regulation by the state banking commissioner, if the takeover offer is subject to approval by the state banking commissioner;

A corporation subject to regulation by the public service commission, if the takeover offer is subject to approval of the public service commission; or

A public utility, public utility holding company, bank holding company, or savings and loan association subject to regulation by a federal agency if the takeover offer is subject to the approval by that federal agency.

“Voting stock” means:

For purposes other than determining whether a person is an interested stockholder, stock of any class or series entitled to vote generally in the election of directors;

For purposes of determining whether a person is an interested stockholder, stock deemed to be owned by the person but shall not include any other unissued stock of the corporation which may be issuable pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding, or upon exercise of conversion rights, warrants or options, or otherwise.

“This act” means W.S.

17-18-101

through

17-18-403

.

For the purpose of determining whether a person is an interested stockholder as defined in paragraph (b)(vii) of this section, the number of voting stock of the corporation considered outstanding includes stock considered owned by that person, but does not include other unissued voting stock of the qualified corporation that may be issuable pursuant to an agreement, arrangement or understanding, or upon exercise of conversion rights, warrants or options, or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 1990, ch. 62, § 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2000, ch. 35, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see §

17-16-101

et seq.

As to public service commission, see §

37-2-101

.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (b)(iv)(D).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “W.S. 17-16-140(a)(xxxix)” for “W.S. 17-16-140(a)(xxii)” in (b)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-18-103.
Requirements to choose options.

Any qualified corporation may elect to exercise or not to exercise any of the options set forth in articles 1 and 2 of this act. No elections for an option shall be made if the corporation does not meet the criteria of a qualified corporation at the time of the election. Any elections made under articles 1 and 2 of this act may be terminated in the same manner as the elections are made subject to the restrictions of this act.

If a corporation ceases to have substantial business operations within Wyoming, any election made under articles 1 and 2 of this act shall be null and void until the substantial business operations are restored and maintained for at least ninety (90) days. If the corporation terminates substantial business operations in Wyoming for the purpose of terminating an election under articles 1 and 2 of this act, the election shall remain in effect. If a corporation terminates substantial business operations within Wyoming for the purpose of voiding the restrictions on business combinations with interested stockholders provided by W.S.

17-18-104

, the restrictions shall remain in effect.

If a corporation ceases to be a qualified corporation because it is no longer a large publicly traded corporation due to insufficient assets required by the definition provided in W.S. 17-18-102(b)(viii), at the end of a fiscal year any election made under articles 1 and 2 of this act and the requirements of W.S.

17-18-104

and article 3 of this act shall be null and void sixty (60) days after the end of the following fiscal year unless sufficient assets are again present at the end of that fiscal year.

If a corporation ceases to be a qualified corporation because it is no longer a large publicly traded corporation due to failure to meet the class of voting stock requirements required by the definition provided in W.S. 17-18-102(b)(viii), the corporation shall continue to be subject to W.S.

17-18-104

and article 3 of this act for five (5) years and any election made under articles 1 and 2 of this act prior to the failure to meet the criteria shall be null and void five (5) years from the date of the failure to meet the criteria. If the criteria are again met the election shall become effective and the corporation shall continue to be subject to W.S.

17-18-104

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 1990, ch. 62, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

§ 17-18-104.
Option; restrictions on business combinations.

Every qualified corporation is subject to the restrictions on business combinations with interested stockholders provided in this section unless the corporation elects not to be subject to the restrictions. A corporation which is not a qualified corporation may elect not to be subject to the restrictions on business combinations in the event it becomes a qualified corporation. The election shall be made either:

Through a specific provision in the articles of incorporation;

Through a statement in the bylaws that the corporation elects not to be subject to the restrictions in W.S. 17-18-104(b). This election shall be effective immediately upon adoption of the bylaws, unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise; or

By filing a statement making the election with the secretary of state. This election shall be authorized by the corporation’s board of directors and shall be effective from the date of filing with the secretary of state.

A qualified corporation shall not, directly or indirectly, enter into or engage in any business combination with any interested stockholder or any affiliate or associate of the interested stockholder for a period of three (3) years after the date the stockholder became an interested stockholder, unless:

Prior to the time the stockholder became an interested stockholder, the board of directors of the corporation approved either the business combination or the transaction which resulted in the stockholder becoming an interested stockholder; or

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 62, §§ 2, 3.

On or after the time the stockholder became an interested stockholder, the business combination is approved by the board of directors and authorized at an annual or special meeting of stockholders, and not by written consent, by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting stock which is not owned by the interested stockholder.

The restrictions contained in this section shall not apply if:

A stockholder becomes an interested stockholder inadvertently and as soon as practical divests sufficient stocks so that he ceases to be an interested stockholder, and would not, at any time within the three (3) year period immediately before a business combination between the corporation and the stockholder, have been an interested stockholder but for the inadvertent acquisition;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 62, §§ 2, 3.

The election not to be subject to the restrictions on business combinations may be revoked in the same manner as the elections are made. With respect to any interested stockholder the election not to be subject to the restrictions shall not be effective for a period of three (3) years after the date that the stockholder became an interested stockholder.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 1990, ch. 62, §§ 2, 3.

Legislative findings. —

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 2, provides: “The legislature finds that W.S.

17-18-104

is modeled from the Delaware Antitakeover Law, Chapter 204, Section 203, Delaware Code (1988) and that W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-115

are modeled from the Indiana Code, Sections 23-2-3.1-1. through 23-2-3.1-11. (1988) and that case law interpreting the Delaware and Indiana statutes should be used in interpreting the corresponding Wyoming statutes.”

§ 17-18-105.
Option; shareholder takeover protection provisions.

Any qualified corporation is subject to the shareholder takeover protection provisions listed in W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-111

unless the corporation elects not to be subject to the restrictions. A corporation which is not a qualified corporation may elect not to be subject to the shareholder takeover provisions in the event it becomes a qualified corporation. The election shall be made either:

Through a specific provision in the articles of incorporation;

Through a statement in the bylaws that the corporation elects not to be subject to the restrictions in W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-111

. This election shall be effective immediately upon adoption of the bylaws, unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise; or

By filing a statement making the election with the secretary of state. This election shall be authorized by the corporation’s board of directors and shall be effective from the date of filing with the secretary of state.

If a takeover offer is outstanding and in progress at the time the election becomes effective, all further acquisition of stock by the offeror shall cease until the offer is in compliance with the stockholder takeover protection provision of W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-111

. The offeror may take any steps necessary to comply with these provisions before the election becomes effective.

The election not to be subject to the shareholder takeover provisions of W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-111

may be revoked by the same method employed under subsection (a) of this section for making the election.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 1990, ch. 62, § 2.

Legislative findings. —

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 2, provides: “The legislature finds that W.S.

17-18-104

is modeled from the Delaware Antitakeover Law, Chapter 204, Section 203, Delaware Code (1988) and that W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-115

are modeled from the Indiana Code, Sections 23-2-3.1-1. through 23-2-3.1-11. (1988) and that case law interpreting the Delaware and Indiana statutes should be used in interpreting the corresponding Wyoming statutes.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

§ 17-18-106.
Statement; consent to service of process; filing fee; copy to target company.

The offeror, before making a takeover offer, shall file with the secretary of state a statement in compliance with subsection (b) of this section and a consent to service of process. The offeror shall pay a filing fee of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) and shall, not later than the filing date of the statement, deliver a copy of the statement to the target company at its principal office and, if different, to its Wyoming registered agent for service of process.

If a takeover offer is subject to any federal law, the statement shall be one (1) copy of each document required to be filed with the securities and exchange commission and any other federal agency. If the takeover offer is not subject to any requirement of federal law, the statement shall be filed on forms prescribed by the secretary of state and shall contain the following information:

The identity of and material information concerning the offeror, including:

If the offeror is a corporation, information concerning its organization, including the year and jurisdiction of its organization, a description of each class of its capital stock and long-term debt, a description of the business done by the offeror and its affiliates and any material changes of its business during the past three (3) years, a description of the location and character of the principal properties of the offeror and its affiliates, a description of any material pending legal or administrative proceedings in which the offeror or any of its affiliates is a party, the names of all directors and executive officers of the offeror and their material business activities and affiliations during the past three (3) years, and audited financial statements of the offeror and its affiliates for its three (3) most recent annual accounting periods and interim financial statements for any current period;

If the offeror is not a corporation, information concerning the person’s background, including his material business activities and affiliations during the past three (3) years, and a description of any material pending legal or administrative proceeding in which he is a party.

The source and amount of funds or other consideration used or to be used in acquiring any equity security, including a statement describing any securities which are being offered in exchange for the equity securities of the target company, and, if any part of the acquisition price is or will be represented by borrowed funds or other consideration, a description of the transaction and the names of all the parties;

If the purpose of the acquisition is to gain control of the target company, a statement of any plans or proposals or negotiations with respect to the acquisition which the offeror has upon gaining control to liquidate the target company, sell its assets, effect its merger or consolidation, or make any other major change in its business, corporate structure, management or personnel;

The number of shares or units of any equity security of the target company of which each offeror is the record or beneficial owner or which the offeror has a right to acquire, directly or indirectly;

Information as to any contracts, arrangements, understandings or negotiations with any person concerning any equity security of the target company, including transfers of any equity security, joint ventures, loan or option arrangements, puts and calls, guarantees of loan, guarantees against loss, guarantees of profits, division of losses or profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies, naming the persons with whom those contracts, arrangements or understandings have been entered;

Information as to any contracts, arrangements, understandings or negotiations, with any person who is an officer, director, administrator, manager, executive employee, or record or beneficial owner of equity securities of the target company with respect to the tender of any equity securities of the target company, the purchase by the offeror of any equity securities owned by that person otherwise than pursuant to the takeover offer, the retention of any person in his present position or in any other management position or with respect to that person giving or withholding a favorable recommendation to the takeover offer;

A description of the provisions made or to be made for providing all material information concerning the takeover offer to the offerees, including a description of the proposed takeover offer in the form proposed to be published or sent to the offerees initially disclosing the takeover offer; and

Any other information which the secretary of state prescribes by regulation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), deleted “including the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 78 as amended as of January 1, 1989” following “If a takeover offer is subject to any federal law.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-18-107.
Takeover offers; substantially equivalent terms to all offerees of same class.

No takeover offer shall be made which is not made to all offerees holding the same class of equity securities of the target company on substantially equivalent terms. A takeover offer to purchase less than all equity securities of the same class of the outstanding equity securities of the target company is not considered as having been made to all offerees of that class on substantially equivalent terms if the pro rata portion of equity securities of that class tendered by any offeree which will be accepted by the offeror is not equal to the highest pro rata portion of equity securities of that class tendered by any other offeree which will be accepted by the offeror. A takeover offer permitting offerees to elect to receive one (1) or more differing kinds of consideration is not considered as having been made to all offerees holding the same class of equity securities of the target company on substantially equivalent terms if proration occurs and the pro rata share of any one (1) or more differing kinds of consideration which is allocable to any offeree is not equal to the highest pro rata share allocable to any other offeree.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-108.
Waiting period after offer; no purchase or payment in violation of order.

No stock shall be contracted for, purchased or paid for pursuant to a takeover offer within the first twenty (20) business days after the offer is made. No shares shall be purchased or paid for in violation of any order of the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-109.
Waiting period after takeover; no acquisitions of equity securities of target company.

No offeror may acquire in any manner any equity security of any class of a target company at any time within two (2) years following the conclusion of a takeover offer with respect to that class, including but not limited to acquisitions made by purchase, exchange, merger, consolidation, partial or complete liquidation, redemption, reverse stock split, and any other recapitalization or reorganization, unless the holder of that equity security is also afforded, at the time of that acquisition, a reasonable opportunity to dispose of that security to the offeror upon substantially equivalent terms. If a takeover offer is made or concluded while the election to be subject to the shareholder takeover protection provisions is in effect, the requirement of this section shall remain in effect for two (2) years following the conclusion of the takeover offer even if the election is subsequently terminated.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-110.
Takeover offer; untrue statements or omission of material facts unlawful.

In connection with any takeover offer, or any solicitation of offerees in opposition to or in favor of any takeover offer, it is unlawful for any person to make any untrue statement of a material fact or to omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, or to engage in any fraudulent, deceptive or manipulative acts or practices.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-111.
Exemptions to takeover requirements; burden of establishing entitlement.

Even if a corporation has elected to be subject to the provisions of W.S.

17-18-106

through

17-18-110

do not apply to the following:

An acquisition by an offeror, if the instant transaction and all acquisitions of equity securities of the same class during the preceding twelve (12) months by the offeror or any of its affiliates do not exceed two percent (2%) of that class; or

An acquisition determined by order of the secretary of state to be a takeover offer that is not made for the purpose of, and not having the effect of, changing or influencing the control of a target company.

An order may only be adopted under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section after a hearing pursuant to W.S.

17-18-113

.

The burden of establishing entitlement to any exemption is on the offeror.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-112.
Administration; regulations; rulemaking authority; individual liability of state officers or employees prohibited.

This act shall be administered by the secretary of state of Wyoming.

The secretary of state may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

Neither the secretary of state, nor any of his employees, shall be liable in their individual capacity, except to the state of Wyoming, for any act done or omitted in connection with the performance of their respective duties under the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1.

§ 17-18-113.
Hearing; order of secretary of state prohibiting or conditioning purchase.

Whenever it appears to the secretary of state that any person has acted or is about to act in a manner constituting a violation of any provision of this act or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this act, the secretary of state shall call a hearing to investigate the matter. Any interested person may petition the secretary of state for a hearing if that person reasonably believes a violation of W.S.

17-18-105

through

17-18-111

has or is about to occur, or for purposes of W.S.

17-18-111

(b).

At least five (5) days notice that a hearing will be held under this section shall be given to the target company, the offeror, and other persons as the secretary of state may designate.

The expenses, including the cost of transcripts and all expenses of the state, of all hearings held under this section shall be borne by the offeror. As security for the payment of these expenses, the offeror shall file with the secretary of state an acceptable bond or other deposit in an amount to be determined by the secretary of state.

The target company, the offeror, any offeree, and any other person whose interests may be affected have the right to appear at any hearing held pursuant to this section, and to become a party to the proceeding. Any person appearing at or party to the hearing has the rights granted in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

If the secretary of state finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the takeover statement fails to provide full and fair disclosure to the offerees of all material information concerning the takeover offer or that the takeover offer is not made to all offerees of the same class of equity securities of the target company on substantially equivalent terms, he shall by order prohibit the purchase of shares tendered in response to the takeover offer or condition purchase upon changes or modifications.

In the case of a takeover offer subject to the approval of the insurance commissioner, the offeror within five (5) days after the statement is filed shall mail a notice to all offerees of the target company advising them of the general terms and conditions of the takeover offer and the date of the hearing at which they may appear. No shares shall be contracted for, purchased or paid for until after approval by both the secretary of state and the insurance commissioner. All expenses of notifying the offerees shall be paid by the offeror.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 1990, ch. 62, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to insurance commissioner, see §

26-2-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).